District of Columbia statutes.
42-1306

Good faith disclosure.

Each disclosure required by this chapter shall be made in good faith. For the purposes of this chapter, “good faith” means honesty in fact in the making of the disclosure.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-263, § 7, 46 DCR 2111
1981 Ed., § 45-956.